Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 8. REGULATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL AND INDUSTRIAL TRADES

CHAPTER 1301. PLUMBERS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1301.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Plumbing License Law.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the Texas State Board of Plumbing Examiners.

(1-a) "Control valve" means a valve that operates each time water is supplied to, or shut off from, a receptacle or plumbing fixture. The term does not include a stop valve that may be installed in the water supply branch to the control valve.

(1-b) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Texas State Board of Plumbing Examiners.

(2) "Drain cleaner" means a person who:

(A) has completed at least 4,000 hours working under the supervision of a responsible master plumber as a drain cleaner-restricted registrant;

(B) has fulfilled the requirements of and is registered with the board; and

(C) installs cleanouts and removes and resets p-traps to eliminate obstructions in building drains and sewers under the supervision of a responsible master plumber.

(3) "Drain cleaner-restricted registrant" means a person who:

(A) has worked as a plumber's apprentice under the supervision of a responsible master plumber;

(B) has fulfilled the requirements of and is registered with the board; and

(C) clears obstructions in sewer and drain lines through any code-approved existing opening under the supervision of a responsible master plumber.

(4) "Journeyman plumber" means a person licensed under this chapter who:

(A) has met the qualifications for registration as a plumber's apprentice or for licensing as a tradesman plumber-limited license holder;

(B) has completed at least 8,000 hours working under the supervision of a responsible master plumber;

(C) installs, changes, repairs, services, or renovates plumbing or supervises any of those activities under the supervision of a responsible master plumber;

(D) has passed the required examination; and

(E) has fulfilled the other requirements of the board.

(5) "Master plumber" means a person licensed under this chapter who:

(A) is skilled in the design, planning, and superintending of plumbing and in the practical installation, repair, and servicing of plumbing;

(B) has worked as a journeyman plumber:

(i) for at least four years; or

(ii) for at least one year and has successfully completed a training program approved by the United States Department of Labor Office of Apprenticeship or another nationally recognized apprentice training program accepted by the board;

(C) performs or supervises plumbing work;

(D) has passed the required examination; and

(E) has fulfilled the other requirements of the board.

(5-a) "Multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler specialist" means a person who holds an endorsement issued under Section 1301.3565.

(6) "Plumber's apprentice" means a person other than a master plumber, journeyman plumber, or tradesman plumber-limited license holder who, as the person's principal occupation, learns about and assists in the installation of plumbing, has fulfilled the requirements of and is registered by the board, and works under the supervision of a responsible master plumber and the direct supervision of a licensed plumber.

(7) "Plumbing" means:

(A) a fixture, appurtenance, appliance, or piping, including a disposal system, used to:

(i) supply, distribute, circulate, or recirculate water, other liquid, or gas; or

(ii) eliminate sewage for a personal or domestic purpose;

(B) a fixture, appurtenance, appliance, or piping used outside a building to connect the building to:

(i) a supply of water, other liquid, medical gases and vacuum, or other gas on the premises; or

(ii) the main in the street or alley or at the curb;

(C) a fixture, appurtenance, appliance, or piping, including a drain or waste pipe, used to carry wastewater or sewage from or within a building to:

(i) a sewer service lateral at the curb or in the street or alley; or

(ii) a disposal or septic terminal that holds private or domestic sewage; or

(D) the installation, repair, service, or maintenance of a fixture, appurtenance, appliance, or piping described by Paragraph (A), (B), or (C).

(8) "Plumbing inspector" means a person who:

(A) is employed by a political subdivision or state agency, or contracts as an independent contractor with a political subdivision or state agency, to inspect plumbing in connection with health and safety laws, including ordinances, and plumbing and gas codes;

(B) has passed the required examination; and

(C) has fulfilled the other requirements of the board.

(9) "Residential utilities installer" means a person who:

(A) has completed at least 2,000 hours working under the supervision of a master plumber as a plumber's apprentice;

(B) has fulfilled the requirements of and is registered with the board; and

(C) constructs and installs yard water service piping for one-family or two-family dwellings and building sewers under the supervision of a responsible master plumber.

(9-a) "Responsible master plumber" means a person licensed as a master plumber under this chapter who:

(A) allows the person's master plumber license to be used by one plumbing company for the purpose of offering and performing plumbing work under the person's master plumber license;

(B) is authorized to obtain permits for plumbing work;

(C) assumes responsibility for plumbing work performed under the person's license; and

(D) has submitted a certificate of insurance as required by Section 1301.3576.

(10) "Tradesman plumber-limited license holder" means a person who:

(A) has:

(i) completed at least 4,000 hours working under the direct supervision of a journeyman or master plumber as a plumber's apprentice; or

(ii) successfully completed a coherent sequence of courses in the plumbing trade that are offered through a career and technology education program, as described by Section 1301.3542;

(B) has passed the required examination;

(C) constructs and installs plumbing for one-family or two-family dwellings under the supervision of a responsible master plumber; and

(D) has fulfilled the other requirements of the board.

(11) "Water supply protection specialist" means a person who holds an endorsement issued by the board to engage in:

(A) customer service inspections, as defined by rule of the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality; and

(B) the installation, service, and repair of plumbing associated with the treatment, use, and distribution use of rainwater to supply a plumbing fixture or appliance.

(12) "Water treatment" means a business conducted under contract that requires ability, experience, and skill in analyzing water to determine how to treat influent and effluent water to change or purify the water or to add or remove minerals, chemicals, or bacteria. The term does not include treatment of rainwater or the repair of systems for rainwater harvesting. The term includes:

(A) installing and servicing fixed or portable water treatment equipment in a public or private water treatment system; or

(B) making connections necessary to install a water treatment system.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 1(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.301(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 18.002, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 18.003, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (H.B. 2376), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 981 (H.B. 2062), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (H.B. 2255), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 2, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.003. APPLICATION OF SUNSET ACT. The Texas State Board of Plumbing Examiners is subject to Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the board is abolished and this chapter expires September 1, 2033.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (S.B. 652), Sec. 4.09, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 3, eff. May 26, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (S.B. 1659), Sec. 2.18, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 1301.004. NONAPPLICABILITY OF LAW GOVERNING CANCELLATION OF CERTAIN TRANSACTIONS. Except as otherwise provided by this section, Chapter 601, Business & Commerce Code, does not apply to a good or service provided by a license holder under this chapter if the transaction involving the good or service is initiated by the consumer. Chapter 601, Business & Commerce Code, does apply to a transaction that involves a breach of express warranty or a negligent installation in violation of a building code applicable to the good or service sold to the consumer.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3129), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. EXEMPTIONS

Sec. 1301.051. PLUMBING BY PROPERTY OWNER IN HOMESTEAD. A property owner is not required to be licensed under this chapter to perform plumbing in the property owner's homestead.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.052. WORK INSIDE COUNTIES OR INSIDE OR OUTSIDE MUNICIPALITIES. A person is not required to be licensed under this chapter to perform plumbing, other than plumbing performed in conjunction with new construction, repair, or remodeling, on a property that is:

(1) located in a subdivision or on a tract of land that is not required to be platted under Section 232.0015, Local Government Code;

(2) not connected to a public water system and is located outside a municipality;

(3) located outside a municipality and connected to a public water system that does not require a license to perform plumbing; or

(4) located inside a municipality that is within a county that has fewer than 50,000 inhabitants and that:

(A) has fewer than 5,000 inhabitants; and

(B) by municipal ordinance has authorized a person who is not licensed under this chapter to perform plumbing.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 3(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1301.053. WORK INCIDENTAL TO OTHER PROFESSIONS. (a) A person is not required to be licensed under this chapter to perform:

(1) plumbing incidental to and in connection with the business in which the person is employed or engaged if the person:

(A) is regularly employed as or acting as a maintenance person or maintenance engineer; and

(B) does not engage in plumbing for the public;

(2) construction, installation, or maintenance on the premises or equipment of a railroad if the person is an employee of the railroad who does not engage in plumbing for the public;

(3) plumbing if the person is engaged by a public service company to:

(A) lay, maintain, or operate its service mains or lines to the point of measurement; and

(B) install, change, adjust, repair, remove, or renovate appurtenances, equipment, or appliances;

(4) appliance installation and service work, other than installation and service work on water heaters, that involves connecting appliances to existing openings with a code-approved appliance connector if the person performs the work as an appliance dealer or an employee of an appliance dealer; or

(5) water treatment installations, exchanges, services, or repairs, other than the treatment of rainwater to supply a plumbing fixture or appliance.

(b) Work described by this section is subject to inspection and approval as provided by applicable state law or municipal ordinance.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.303(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 981 (H.B. 2062), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 1301.054. IRRIGATORS AND WATER WELL PUMP INSTALLERS. A person is not required to be licensed under this chapter to perform plumbing if the person holds a:

(1) certificate of registration as an irrigator issued under Chapter 1903; or

(2) license as a water well pump installer issued under Chapter 1902.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.055. LP GAS INSTALLERS. A person is not required to be licensed under this chapter to perform LPG system installation if the person performs the LPG system installation as an LP gas installer licensed under Subchapter D, Chapter 113, Natural Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.303(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.056. LAWN IRRIGATION SYSTEMS. A person licensed by the board is not required to be licensed by another board or agency to install or work on a lawn irrigation system.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.057. SELF-HELP PROJECT. (a) A person is not required to be licensed under this chapter to perform plumbing, limited to the provision of a residential potable water supply or residential sanitary sewer connection, for a project that:

(1) is in a county a part of which is within 50 miles of an international border; and

(2) is performed by an organization that:

(A) is certified by the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission to provide self-help project assistance; and

(B) provides the board with the following information before the 30th day before the date the project begins:

(i) the exact location of the project;

(ii) the intended duration of the project; and

(iii) other information the board requires.

(b) The board may require under Subsection (a)(2)(B)(iii) that the organization provide a post-construction report signed by a plumbing inspector stating that the plumbing is safe.

(c) The board may provide training to an organization that provides self-help project assistance under this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.058. TESTING OF MEDICAL GAS AND VACUUM PIPING. A person is not required to be licensed under this chapter to verify medical gas and vacuum piping integrity and content.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.303(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.059. WORK PERFORMED ON CERTAIN PRIVATE PROPERTY. (a) A person is not required to be licensed under this chapter to perform work consisting of installing, servicing, or repairing service mains or service lines that provide water, sewer, or storm drainage services on private property in an area that extends from a public right-of-way or public easement to not less than five feet from a building or structure.

(b) This section does not apply to plumbing work performed on private property designated for use as a one-family or two-family dwelling.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 715 (H.B. 2334), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. TEXAS STATE BOARD OF PLUMBING EXAMINERS

Sec. 1301.151. TEXAS STATE BOARD OF PLUMBING EXAMINERS MEMBERSHIP. (a) The Texas State Board of Plumbing Examiners consists of nine members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate as follows:

(1) one member who has at least 10 years' practical experience and is licensed as a master plumber;

(2) one member who has at least five years' practical experience and is licensed as a journeyman plumber;

(3) one member who has at least five years' practical experience and is licensed as a plumbing inspector;

(4) one member who has been a responsible master plumber for at least five years with at least 10 years' experience as a licensed journeyman plumber or master plumber;

(5) one member who is a licensed engineer practicing in the field of plumbing engineering;

(6) two members who are building contractors with at least five years' contracting experience, one of whom is principally engaged in home building and one of whom is principally engaged in commercial building; and

(7) two members who represent the public.

(b) Each member of the board must be a United States citizen.

(c) Appointments to the board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.304(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (H.B. 2255), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 1301.152. ELIGIBILITY OF PUBLIC MEMBERS. A person is not eligible for appointment as a public member of the board if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is licensed by an occupational regulatory agency in the building construction industry;

(2) is employed by or participates in the management of an agency or business entity related to the building construction industry; or

(3) has, other than as a consumer, a financial interest in a business entity related to the building construction industry.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.153. MEMBERSHIP AND EMPLOYEE RESTRICTIONS. (a) In this section, "Texas trade association" means a cooperative and voluntarily joined statewide association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in dealing with mutual business or professional problems and in promoting their common interest.

(b) A person may not be a member of the board and may not be a board employee employed in a "bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity," as that phrase is used for purposes of establishing an exemption to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.), and its subsequent amendments, if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of building construction; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of building construction.

(c) A person may not be a member of the board or act as the general counsel to the board or the agency if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the agency.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.154. TERMS. Board members serve staggered six-year terms.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.155. ISSUANCE OF COMMISSION. On presentation of the constitutional oath of office and a certificate of appointment, the secretary of state shall issue a commission to a board member as evidence of the person's authority to act as a board member.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.156. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL. (a) It is a ground for removal from the board that a member:

(1) does not have at the time of taking office the qualifications required by Section 1301.151 or 1301.152;

(2) does not maintain during service on the board the qualifications required by Section 1301.151 or 1301.152;

(3) is ineligible for membership under Section 1301.153;

(4) cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(5) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled board meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year without an excuse approved by a majority vote of the board.

(b) The validity of an action of the board is not affected by the fact that it is taken when a ground for removal of a board member exists.

(c) If the executive director has knowledge that a potential ground for removal exists, the executive director shall notify the presiding officer of the board of the potential ground. The presiding officer shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists. If the potential ground for removal involves the presiding officer, the executive director shall notify the next highest ranking officer of the board, who shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.157. OFFICERS. (a) The governor shall designate a member of the board as the presiding officer of the board to serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the governor.

(b) The board shall elect a secretary from its membership.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.158. PER DIEM; REIMBURSEMENT. (a) A board member may not receive a fixed salary for service on the board.

(b) A board member is entitled to receive a per diem as set by the General Appropriations Act for each day the member engages in the business of the board.

(c) A board member may not receive reimbursement for travel expenses, including expenses for meals and lodging, other than transportation expenses. A member is entitled to reimbursement for transportation expenses as provided by the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.159. TRAINING. (a) A person who is appointed to and qualifies for office as a member of the board may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the board until the person completes a training program that complies with this section.

(b) The training program must provide the person with information regarding:

(1) this chapter;

(2) the programs operated by the agency;

(3) the role and functions of the agency;

(4) the rules of the agency, with an emphasis on the rules that relate to disciplinary and investigatory authority;

(5) the current budget for the agency;

(6) the results of the most recent formal audit of the agency;

(7) the requirements of:

(A) the open meetings law, Chapter 551, Government Code;

(B) the public information law, Chapter 552, Government Code;

(C) the administrative procedure law, Chapter 2001, Government Code; and

(D) other laws relating to public officials, including conflict-of-interest laws; and

(8) any applicable ethics policies adopted by the agency or the Texas Ethics Commission.

(c) A person appointed to the board is entitled to reimbursement, as provided by the General Appropriations Act, for the travel expenses incurred in attending the training program regardless of whether the attendance at the program occurs before or after the person qualifies for office.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER D. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND OTHER BOARD PERSONNEL

Sec. 1301.201. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND STAFF. (a) The board shall employ an executive director as the executive head of the agency.

(b) The board may employ personnel as necessary to administer this chapter. The board may determine the compensation and duties of its employees and the terms of their employment.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.202. CERTAIN PLUMBING EXAMINERS. (a) If an examination required for the issuance of a license, registration, or endorsement under this chapter contains a practical component, the board shall employ or contract with one or more plumbing examiners to administer that portion of the examination. A plumbing examiner must:

(1) hold a license as a plumber issued under this chapter;

(2) be knowledgeable of this chapter and municipal ordinances relating to plumbing; and

(3) be qualified by experience and training in plumbing practice.

(b) A plumbing examiner shall:

(1) examine the fitness and qualifications of a person applying to the board for a license as a master plumber, journeyman plumber, tradesman plumber-limited license holder, or plumbing inspector; and

(2) promptly certify the result of the examination to the board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.305(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (H.B. 2255), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 4, eff. May 26, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 5, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.203. FIELD REPRESENTATIVE; INSPECTIONS. (a) The board may employ a field representative to assist the board in enforcing this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. A field representative must:

(1) hold a license as a plumber under this chapter;

(2) be knowledgeable of this chapter and municipal ordinances relating to plumbing; and

(3) be qualified by experience and training in plumbing practice.

(b) A field representative may:

(1) conduct on-site license checks to determine compliance with this chapter;

(2) investigate consumer complaints filed under Section 1301.303;

(3) assist municipal plumbing inspectors in enforcing this chapter; and

(4) in the performance of the field representative's other duties under this chapter, check the license, registration, or endorsement of a person regulated by the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation in accordance with the memorandum of understanding adopted under Section 1301.259 and report any noncompliance to that agency.

(c) The board by rule shall assign priorities and prescribe procedures for conducting checks described by Subsection (b)(1) based on:

(1) the degree of potential harm to public health, safety, or property;

(2) the history of previous violations of this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter by a person regulated under this chapter; and

(3) any other indication of increased risk to public health, safety, or property, as determined by the board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 6, eff. May 26, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 7, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.204. CAREER LADDER PROGRAM; PERFORMANCE EVALUATIONS. (a) The presiding officer of the board or the presiding officer's designee shall develop an intra-agency career ladder program. The program must require intra-agency posting of each nonentry level position at least 10 days before the date of any public posting.

(b) The presiding officer of the board or the presiding officer's designee shall develop a system of annual performance evaluations based on measurable job tasks. All merit pay for board employees must be based on the system established under this subsection.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.205. EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY POLICY. (a) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement that implements a program of equal employment opportunity to ensure that all personnel decisions are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin.

(b) The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies relating to recruitment, evaluation, selection, training, and promotion of personnel, that show the intent of the agency to avoid the unlawful employment practices described by Chapter 21, Labor Code; and

(2) an analysis of the extent to which the composition of the agency's personnel is in accordance with state and federal law and a description of reasonable methods to achieve compliance with state and federal law.

(c) The policy statement must:

(1) be updated annually;

(2) be reviewed by the state Commission on Human Rights for compliance with Subsection (b)(1); and

(3) be filed with the governor's office.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.207. STANDARDS OF CONDUCT. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall provide to members of the board and to agency employees, as often as necessary, information regarding the requirements for office or employment under this chapter, including information regarding a person's responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.208. SEPARATION OF RESPONSIBILITIES. The board shall develop and implement policies that clearly separate the policy-making responsibilities of the board and the management responsibilities of the executive director and the staff of the agency.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER E. BOARD POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 1301.251. GENERAL DUTIES OF BOARD. The board shall:

(1) administer this chapter;

(2) adopt and enforce rules necessary to administer this chapter; and

(3) keep a record of each proceeding conducted before and action taken by the board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.252. RULES RESTRICTING ADVERTISING OR COMPETITIVE BIDDING. (a) The board may not adopt a rule restricting advertising or competitive bidding by a person licensed under this chapter except to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices by the person.

(b) The board may not include in its rules to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices a rule that:

(1) restricts the person's use of any medium for advertising;

(2) restricts the person's personal appearance or use of the person's voice in an advertisement;

(3) relates to the size or duration of an advertisement by the person; or

(4) restricts the person's advertisement under a trade name.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.253. FEES. The board shall set fees in amounts that are reasonable and necessary to cover the cost of administering this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.254. SEAL. The board shall have an official seal.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.255. ADOPTION OF PLUMBING CODES. (a) The board shall adopt the following plumbing codes, as those codes existed on May 31, 2001:

(1) the Uniform Plumbing Code, as published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials; and

(2) the International Plumbing Code, as published by the International Code Council.

(b) The board by rule may adopt later editions of the plumbing codes listed in Subsection (a).

(c) Plumbing installed in an area not otherwise subject to regulation under this chapter by a person licensed under this chapter must be installed in accordance with a plumbing code adopted by the board under Subsection (a) or (b).

(d) In adopting a code for the design, installation, and maintenance of a plumbing system under this section, a municipality or an owner of a public water system may amend any provisions of the code to conform to local concerns that do not substantially vary from board rules or other rules of this state.

(e) Plumbing installed in compliance with a code adopted under Subsection (a), (b), or (d) must be inspected by a plumbing inspector. To perform the inspection, the political subdivision may contract with any plumbing inspector or qualified plumbing inspection business, as determined by the political subdivision, that is paid directly by the political subdivision.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.306(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1212 (H.B. 1850), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 1301.256. SUBPOENA. (a) The board may request and, if necessary, compel by subpoena:

(1) the attendance of a witness for examination under oath; and

(2) the production for inspection and copying of records, documents, and other evidence relevant to the investigation of an alleged violation of this chapter.

(b) The board, acting through the attorney general, may bring an action to enforce a subpoena issued under Subsection (a) against a person who fails to comply with the subpoena.

(c) Venue for an action brought under Subsection (b) is in a district court in:

(1) Travis County; or

(2) any county in which the board may hold a hearing.

(d) The court shall order compliance with the subpoena if the court finds that good cause exists to issue the subpoena.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Text of section as added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.305(b)

For text of section as added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 13, see Sec. 1301.258, ante.

Sec. 1301.258. ADVISORY COMMITTEES. The board may appoint advisory committees as it considers necessary. An advisory committee shall serve without compensation or reimbursement and is subject to Section 2110.008, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.305(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Text of section as added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 13

For text of section as added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.305(b), see Sec. 1301.258, post.

Sec. 1301.258. BOARD COMMITTEES. (a) The board may create committees to assist the board in exercising its powers and duties.

(b) The presiding officer of the board shall appoint the members of the committees.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(1), eff. May 26, 2021.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 8, eff. May 26, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(1), eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.259. MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING. (a) The board and the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to improve services and coordinate the functions of each agency.

(b) The memorandum of understanding must:

(1) require each agency to share:

(A) information technology to support the regulation and enforcement of occupational licenses; and

(B) information on regulatory practices for licensed occupations, including policy issues that affect the regulation of licensed occupations, standardization of complaint and enforcement techniques, and model licensing techniques;

(2) authorize enforcement officers from each agency to check licenses, registrations, or endorsements held by persons practicing occupations regulated by the other agency and report noncompliance to that agency; and

(3) state the circumstances when a joint investigation between the board and the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation is appropriate.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.260. POLICY ON TECHNOLOGICAL SOLUTIONS. The board shall develop and implement a policy requiring the executive director and agency employees to research and propose appropriate technological solutions to improve the agency's ability to perform its functions. The technological solutions must:

(1) ensure that the public is able to easily find information about the agency on the Internet;

(2) ensure that persons who want to use the agency's services are able to:

(A) interact with the agency through the Internet; and

(B) access any service that can be provided effectively through the Internet; and

(3) be cost-effective and developed through the agency's planning processes.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.261. NEGOTIATED RULEMAKING AND ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION. (a) The board shall develop and implement a policy to encourage the use of:

(1) negotiated rulemaking procedures under Chapter 2008, Government Code, for the adoption of agency rules; and

(2) appropriate alternative dispute resolution procedures under Chapter 2009, Government Code, to assist in the resolution of internal and external disputes under the agency's jurisdiction.

(b) The agency's procedures relating to alternative dispute resolution must conform, to the extent possible, to any model guidelines issued by the State Office of Administrative Hearings for the use of alternative dispute resolution by state agencies.

(c) The board shall designate a trained person to:

(1) coordinate the implementation of the policy adopted under Subsection (a);

(2) serve as a resource for any training needed to implement the procedures for negotiated rulemaking or alternative dispute resolution; and

(3) collect data concerning the effectiveness of those procedures, as implemented by the agency.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.262. PLUMBING INSPECTOR CODE OF CONDUCT. The board by rule shall establish a code of conduct for licensed plumbing inspectors. The code of conduct shall require a plumbing inspector to enforce this chapter and board rules in a consistent manner across job sites.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.263. EXAMINATION ADMINISTRATION AND CONTENT. (a) The board may adopt, recognize, develop, or contract for an examination required by this chapter, including the administration of the examination.

(b) For each examination required by this chapter, the board shall, to the extent feasible, adopt, recognize, develop, or contract for an examination that includes components that may be administered:

(1) in writing or online; and

(2) by a person other than a plumbing examiner described by Section 1301.202.

(c) The board shall determine the passing score for an examination required by this chapter.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 9, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER F. CONSUMER INTEREST INFORMATION AND COMPLAINT PROCEDURES

Sec. 1301.301. CONSUMER INTEREST INFORMATION. (a) The board shall prepare information of consumer interest describing the regulatory functions of the board and the procedures by which consumer complaints are filed with and resolved by the board.

(b) The board shall make the information available to the public and appropriate state agencies.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.3015. PUBLIC PARTICIPATION. The board shall develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the board and to speak on any issue under the jurisdiction of the agency.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.302. CONTRACT INFORMATION; REQUIRED DOCUMENTS. A written proposal, invoice, or contract relating to plumbing services performed by or under the direction of a plumber licensed under this chapter must contain the name and license number of the responsible master plumber and the name, mailing address, and telephone number of the board. The person who performed the services shall give the customer an invoice or completed contract document on completion of the job, regardless of whether the person charged a fee for performing the services.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.308(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 981 (H.B. 2062), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 1301.303. COMPLAINTS. (a) The board may investigate an alleged violation of this chapter by a person who:

(1) is licensed under this chapter;

(2) is the owner of a plumbing company subject to this chapter; or

(3) performs plumbing without holding a license under this chapter.

(b) The board shall maintain a file on each written complaint filed with the board. The file must include:

(1) the name of the person who filed the complaint;

(2) the date the complaint is received by the agency;

(3) the subject matter of the complaint;

(4) the name of any municipality and the county in which the conduct that is the subject of the complaint occurred;

(5) the name of each person contacted in relation to the complaint;

(6) a summary of the results of the review or investigation of the complaint; and

(7) an explanation of the reason the file was closed, if the agency closed the file without taking action other than to investigate the complaint.

(c) The agency shall provide to the person filing the complaint and to each person who is a subject of the complaint a copy of the agency's policies and procedures relating to complaint investigation and resolution.

(d) The board, at least quarterly and until final disposition of the complaint, shall notify the person filing the complaint and each person who is a subject of the complaint of the status of the investigation unless the notice would jeopardize an undercover investigation.

(e) The board by rule shall assign priorities and prescribe investigative procedures for investigations of complaints based on:

(1) the severity of the conduct alleged in the complaint;

(2) the degree of harm to public health, safety, or property;

(3) the history of previous violations of this chapter by the person who is the subject of the complaint; and

(4) any other indication of increased risk to public health, safety, or property, as determined by the board.

(f) The board shall maintain information about complaints, including source, type, and geographical area, to identify and address regulatory problem areas and focus enforcement in those areas.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 981 (H.B. 2062), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 10, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.304. INVESTIGATION OF COMPLAINTS. (a) The board or an employee designated by the board may investigate an alleged violation of this chapter or a board rule.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(2), eff. May 26, 2021.

(c) The board shall conduct joint investigations with the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation as circumstances require.

(d) Unless a threat to health or safety exists, the board may choose to not investigate a complaint in which the person filing the complaint and the person who is the subject of the complaint are engaged in litigation related to the subject matter of the complaint until the outcome of the litigation is finally determined if the board determines the complaint process is being abused.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (H.B. 2376), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 11, eff. May 26, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(2), eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.305. PUBLIC ACCESS TO INFORMATION RELATING TO DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS. (a) The board shall make available to the public through a toll-free telephone number, Internet website, or other easily accessible medium determined by the board the following information relating to a disciplinary action taken regarding a person regulated under this chapter:

(1) the identity of the person;

(2) the nature of the complaint that was the basis of the disciplinary action; and

(3) the disciplinary action taken by the board.

(b) The board may not include the name of the person who filed the complaint in the information made available under Subsection (a).

(c) The board shall present the information made available under Subsection (a) in an impartial manner using commonly understood language.

(d) The board shall regularly update the information made available under this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 12, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER G. LICENSE, ENDORSEMENT, AND REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 1301.351. LICENSE, ENDORSEMENT, OR REGISTRATION REQUIRED. (a) A person, other than a responsible master plumber, may not engage in plumbing unless:

(1) the person holds the proper license, registration, or endorsement required by this chapter; and

(2) the person's work is supervised and controlled by a person licensed under this chapter.

(a-1) A person may not act as a responsible master plumber unless the person holds the appropriate license and meets the requirements for a responsible master plumber under this chapter.

(a-2) A person that advertises or otherwise offers to perform or provide plumbing must secure the services of a responsible master plumber.

(b) A person may not serve as a plumbing inspector unless the person is licensed under this chapter as a plumbing inspector.

(c) A license holder who is supervising and controlling under Subsection (a)(2) the work of a person engaged in the business of plumbing in the construction of a new one-family or two-family dwelling in an unincorporated area of the state must have training and management responsibility for, and shall review and inspect, the person's work. The license holder is not required to provide continuous or uninterrupted on-the-job oversight of the person's work.

(d) A person who holds a license or registration issued under this chapter shall carry the license or registration on his or her person while engaged in plumbing.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.309(b), (c), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 981 (H.B. 2062), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 1301.3515. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR LICENSE ISSUANCE. (a) The board shall require that an applicant for a license submit a complete and legible set of fingerprints, on a form prescribed by the board, to the board or to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(b) The board may not issue a license to a person who does not comply with the requirement of Subsection (a).

(c) The board shall conduct a criminal history record information check of each applicant for a license using information:

(1) provided by the individual under this section; and

(2) made available to the department by the Department of Public Safety, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any other criminal justice agency under Chapter 411, Government Code.

(d) The board may:

(1) enter into an agreement with the Department of Public Safety to administer a criminal history record information check required under this section; and

(2) authorize the Department of Public Safety to collect from each applicant the costs incurred by the Department of Public Safety in conducting the criminal history record information check.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 13, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.352. EXAMINATION REQUIRED. The board shall issue a license or endorsement as a master plumber, journeyman plumber, plumbing inspector, tradesman plumber-limited license holder, medical gas piping installation endorsement holder, water supply protection specialist, or multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler specialist to a person who demonstrates the fitness, competence, and qualifications to receive the license or endorsement by passing a uniform, reasonable examination.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.310(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1301.3521. EXAMINATION FEE REFUND. (a) The board shall refund the examination fee paid by an applicant who:

(1) provides advance notice of the applicant's inability to take the examination; or

(2) is unable to take the examination because of an emergency.

(b) The board shall adopt rules that establish the required notification period and the emergency situations that warrant a refund.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.3522. EXAMINATION REVIEW COURSE. (a) The board shall develop a review course in English and Spanish to assist license applicants in preparation for each license examination offered by the board. If the board provides the review course, the board may charge a fee to an applicant who applies to take the review course.

(b) The board may provide the review course training materials to private course providers for a fee determined by the board.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.353. INSPECTOR CONFLICTS PROHIBITED. The board may not issue a plumbing inspector license to a person who has a financial or advisory interest in a plumbing company.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.354. PLUMBER'S APPRENTICE. (a) A person who desires to learn the trade of plumbing must register as a plumber's apprentice before assisting a person licensed under this chapter in the trade of plumbing.

(b) A person who has worked as a plumber's apprentice for a period established by law or board rule may apply to take an examination for a license as a journeyman plumber or tradesman plumber-limited license holder. Before the applicant may take the examination, the applicant must complete classroom training provided by a board-approved instructor in a board-approved training program in the areas of health and safety, applicable plumbing codes, and water conservation for at least:

(1) 24 hours if the applicant is applying to take a tradesman plumber-limited license holder examination; or

(2) 48 hours if the applicant is applying to take a journeyman plumber examination.

(b-1) At the applicant's request, the board may credit an applicant under Subsection (b) with a number of hours determined by board rule against the number of hours of work experience required to take an examination if the applicant has received an associate of applied science degree from a plumbing technology program that:

(1) includes a combination of classroom and on-the-job training; and

(2) is approved by the board and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) At the applicant's request, the board may credit an applicant under Subsection (b) with up to 1,000 hours of the work experience required before taking an examination if the applicant has completed the classroom portion of a training program:

(1) approved by the United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship; or

(2) provided by a person approved by the board and based on course materials approved by the board.

(c-1) At the applicant's request, the board may credit an applicant under Subsection (b) with up to 250 hours of the work experience required before taking an examination if the applicant has completed a coherent sequence of courses in the construction trade that are offered through a career and technical education program that is approved by the State Board of Education.

(d) Notwithstanding the classroom training required by Subsection (b), a plumber's apprentice may apply for and take an examination for a license as a journeyman plumber or tradesman plumber-limited license holder if the apprentice has received an associate of applied science degree from a plumbing technology program that:

(1) includes a combination of classroom and on-the-job training; and

(2) is approved by the board and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(e) Notwithstanding Subsection (b), a plumber's apprentice who is enrolled in good standing in a training program approved by the United States Department of Labor, Office of Apprenticeship, may take an examination without completing the classroom training required by Subsection (b)(1) or (2).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.311(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 181 (H.B. 1758), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (H.B. 2255), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 281 (H.B. 3049), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2017.

Sec. 1301.3541. APPRENTICE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS. The board by rule may adopt registration requirements for plumber's apprentices, including training and education requirements.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.3542. CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY EDUCATION PROGRAM FOR TRADESMAN PLUMBER-LIMITED LICENSE; INSTRUCTORS. (a) Notwithstanding Section 1301.354, a person who successfully completes a coherent sequence of courses in the plumbing trade that are offered through a career and technology education program may apply for and take an examination for a license as a tradesman plumber-limited license holder. The board may not require the person to register as a plumber's apprentice, pay any fee, or comply with Section 1301.354 or any other requirement of this chapter that applies to a person's eligibility to apply for and take the examination.

(b) A student of any age enrolled in a high school or institution of higher education is eligible to take the sequence of courses described by Subsection (a) without registering as a plumber's apprentice, paying any registration fee to the board, or complying with Section 1301.354 or any other requirement of this chapter that applies to enrolling or participating in those courses.

(c) If an applicant described by Subsection (a) successfully passes the examination for a license as a tradesman plumber-limited license holder, the board shall issue the applicant the license.

(d) The board shall develop the courses described by Subsection (a). If the courses are to be offered at a high school, the courses must be approved by the State Board of Education.

(e) The courses must include an appropriate number of hours of classroom instruction and a practical component. The board may credit on-the-job training toward meeting the requirements under the practical component.

(f) A person may not provide instruction in a career and technology education program described by this section unless the person is licensed under this chapter as a master plumber, journeyman plumber, or plumbing inspector.

(g) A person described by Subsection (f) may provide the instruction in a full-time or part-time capacity as an employee, contractor, or volunteer of a high school or institution of higher education.

(h) The board may adopt rules necessary to implement this section, including procedures to verify a student's successful completion of the sequence of courses described by Subsection (a).

(i) In this section:

(1) "Career and technology education program" means a career and technology education program under Subchapter F, Chapter 29, Education Code, or similar program offered by an institution of higher education.

(2) "Institution of higher education" means an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education as those terms are defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 14, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.355. EXAMINATION RESULTS. (a) The board shall notify each examinee of the results of an examination not later than the 30th day after the date the examination is administered.

(b) If requested in writing by a person who fails an examination, the board shall provide to the person an analysis of the person's performance on the examination.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.356. ENDORSEMENT: MEDICAL GAS PIPING INSTALLATION. (a) A person may not install pipe used solely to transport gas for medical purposes or a vacuum used for medical purposes unless the person:

(1) is licensed under this chapter as a master plumber or journeyman plumber; and

(2) holds an endorsement issued under this section.

(b) A person is eligible to receive a medical gas piping installation endorsement if the person performs satisfactorily on a separate examination related to the endorsement.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(3), eff. May 26, 2021.

(d) An endorsement under this section coincides with rules adopted by the Texas Department of Health.

(e) A plumbing inspector who meets the requirements of the board may hold a medical gas endorsement and inspect medical gas piping installations.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.312(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(3), eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.3565. ENDORSEMENT: MULTIPURPOSE RESIDENTIAL FIRE PROTECTION SPRINKLER SPECIALIST. (a) A person may not engage in the installation of a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system that uses a single piping system to provide potable water for fire protection sprinklers and for domestic plumbing fixtures and appliances unless the person:

(1) is licensed under this chapter as a master plumber or journeyman plumber; and

(2) holds an endorsement issued under this section.

(a-1) A person may not design a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system for installation under this section unless the person:

(1) is licensed under this chapter as a master plumber; and

(2) holds an endorsement issued under this section.

(b) The board shall issue an endorsement as a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler specialist to a person who:

(1) holds the license described by Subsection (a);

(2) applies to the board on a form prescribed by the board;

(3) pays a fee set by the board;

(4) presents evidence satisfactory to the board of successful completion of a training program approved by the board that provides the training necessary for the proper design and installation of a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system as required by the applicable codes and standards recognized by the state; and

(5) passes an examination required by the board.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(4), eff. May 26, 2021.

(d) A person who holds an endorsement under this section may represent to the public that the person is a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler specialist.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who holds an endorsement under this section is not required to hold a license or registration issued by another state agency in order to install a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system.

(e-1) Notwithstanding any other law, a master plumber who holds an endorsement under this section is not required to hold a license or registration issued by another state agency in order to design a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system for installation under this section.

(f) A plumbing inspector who meets the requirements of the board may inspect a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler installation.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009; Subsec. (a) eff. June 1, 2010.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (H.B. 2376), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(4), eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.357. ENDORSEMENT: WATER SUPPLY PROTECTION SPECIALIST. (a) A person licensed under this chapter may not act as a water supply protection specialist unless the person holds an endorsement issued under this section.

(b) The board shall issue an endorsement as a water supply protection specialist to a person who:

(1) is licensed under this chapter as a master plumber or journeyman plumber;

(2) applies to the board on a form prescribed by the board;

(3) pays a fee set by the board;

(4) presents evidence satisfactory to the board of successful completion of a certification program approved by the board for water supply protection specialists; and

(5) passes an examination required by the board.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(5), eff. May 26, 2021.

(d) A person who holds an endorsement under this section may represent to the public that the person is a water supply protection specialist.

(e) A person is not required to hold a water supply protection specialist endorsement if the person is employed by:

(1) a political subdivision; or

(2) an electric utility as defined by Section 31.002, Utilities Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 981 (H.B. 2062), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(5), eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.3575. REGISTRATION OF CERTAIN PERSONS. The board shall register a person who complies with this chapter as a drain cleaner, drain cleaner-restricted registrant, residential utilities installer, or plumber's apprentice.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.305(c), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.3576. CERTIFICATE OF INSURANCE FOR RESPONSIBLE MASTER PLUMBER. Before a master plumber works as a responsible master plumber, the master plumber must provide the board with a certificate of insurance that meets the requirements of Section 1301.552.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.315(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (H.B. 2376), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 15, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.3581. RECIPROCITY. (a) The board may waive any prerequisite to obtaining a license, registration, or endorsement issued under this chapter for an applicant who holds a similar license, registration, or endorsement issued by another jurisdiction that has licensing requirements substantially equivalent to those of this state.

(b) The board may make an agreement, subject to the approval of the governor, with another state to allow for licensing by reciprocity if the other state has requirements for a license, registration, or endorsement substantially equivalent to those of this state.

(c) An applicant under this section must:

(1) apply in the same manner and form as any other applicant under this chapter; and

(2) provide the board with documents and other evidence that substantiate the applicant's qualifications.

(d) An applicant for a license, registration, or endorsement issued under this section may not be required to undergo an examination to obtain the license, registration, or endorsement if the applicant has held an equivalent license, registration, or endorsement in another jurisdiction for at least two years. The board may adopt rules for determining whether a license, registration, or endorsement issued by another jurisdiction is equivalent to a license, registration, or endorsement issued under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 16, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.3585. LICENSE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR APPLICANTS WITH MILITARY EXPERIENCE. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall credit verified military service, training, or education toward the licensing requirements, other than examination requirements, for a license issued under this chapter by the board.

(b) The board shall expedite the issuance of a provisional license or a license by endorsement or reciprocity under this chapter to an applicant who:

(1) has verified military experience; and

(2) holds a current license issued by another jurisdiction that has license requirements that are substantially equivalent to the license requirements of this state.

(c) The board shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 976 (H.B. 2028), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1301.359. STATEWIDE VALIDITY OF LICENSE, ENDORSEMENT, OR REGISTRATION; NONTRANSFERABILITY. (a) A license, endorsement, or registration issued under this chapter is valid throughout this state.

(b) Except as provided by Section 1301.406, the number of a license, endorsement, or registration issued under this chapter is not assignable or transferable.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.307(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1074 (H.B. 2464), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 273 (H.B. 2095), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 1301.360. TEMPORARY LICENSE. (a) The board by rule may provide for the issuance of a temporary license to an applicant who:

(1) submits to the board an application on a form prescribed by the board;

(2) meets preliminary qualifications established by board rule; and

(3) pays a fee set by the board.

(b) A temporary license issued under this section expires on the 30th day after the date of issuance and may not be renewed.

(c) A temporary license holder is subject to:

(1) this chapter;

(2) any law applicable to the activity for which the license is required, including municipal rules, orders, or ordinances; and

(3) any rule of the board applicable to the license.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 17, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER H. LICENSE, ENDORSEMENT, AND REGISTRATION EXPIRATION AND RENEWAL

Sec. 1301.401. ANNUAL RENEWAL REQUIRED; EXCEPTION. (a) A license, registration, or endorsement under this chapter is valid for one year. Except as provided by Subsection (d), on payment of the required fee, a license, registration, or endorsement may be renewed annually.

(b) The board by rule may adopt a system under which licenses, endorsements, and registrations expire on various dates during the year.

(c) An endorsement issued under Section 1301.356, 1301.3565, or 1301.357 expires on the date the master plumber or journeyman plumber license of the endorsement holder expires. The board shall adopt rules to provide for the license holder to renew the endorsement in the same transaction as the license if the license holder:

(1) has completed any continuing education requirement established by rule and applicable to the endorsement; and

(2) complies with other requirements prescribed by board rule.

(d) A person who is employed by, under contract with, or engaged as a volunteer by a school or institution of higher education to provide instruction in a career and technology education program described by Section 1301.3542 and provides meaningful course instruction in the program, as determined under rules adopted under Section 1301.407, is not required to pay a fee to renew the person's license.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.307(c), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 18, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.402. NOTICE OF LICENSE, ENDORSEMENT, OR REGISTRATION EXPIRATION. (a) Not later than the 31st day before the expiration date of a person's license, endorsement, or registration, the board shall send written notice of the impending expiration to the person at the person's last known address according to board records.

(b) The person shall notify the board not later than the 30th day after the date of receipt of the written notice of any change of name or address.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.307(c), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.403. PROCEDURE FOR RENEWAL. (a) A person who is otherwise eligible to renew a license, endorsement, or registration may renew an unexpired license, endorsement, or registration by paying the required renewal fee to the agency before the expiration date of the license, endorsement, or registration. A person whose license, endorsement, or registration has expired may not engage in activities that require a license, endorsement, or registration until the license, endorsement, or registration has been renewed.

(b) A person whose license or endorsement has been expired for 90 days or less may renew the license or endorsement by paying to the agency a renewal fee that is equal to 1-1/2 times the normally required renewal fee. A person whose registration has been expired for 90 days or less may renew the registration by paying to the board a renewal fee that is equal to 1-1/2 times the normally required renewal fee.

(c) A person whose license or endorsement has been expired for more than 90 days but less than two years may renew the license or endorsement by paying to the agency a renewal fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee. A person whose registration has been expired for more than 90 days but less than two years may renew the registration by paying to the board a renewal fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee.

(d) A person whose license, endorsement, or registration has been expired for two years or more may not renew the license, endorsement, or registration. The person may obtain a new license, endorsement, or registration by complying with the requirements and procedures, including the examination requirements, for obtaining an original license, endorsement, or registration.

(e) A person who held a license, endorsement, or registration in this state, moved to another state, and is currently holding a license, endorsement, or registration and has been in practice in the other state for the two years preceding the date of application may obtain a new license, endorsement, or registration without reexamination. The person must pay to the agency a fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee for the license, endorsement, or registration.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(7), eff. May 26, 2021.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 21(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(7), eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.404. MANDATORY CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION. (a) The board by rule shall establish:

(1) minimum curriculum standards for continuing education programs and courses for persons who hold a license or endorsement issued under this chapter; and

(2) minimum qualifications for an instructor of the continuing education programs and courses described by Subdivision (1).

(b) A person who holds a license or endorsement under this chapter must complete at least six hours of continuing professional education annually to renew the person's license or endorsement. Three of the six hours must be in the subjects of health protection, energy conservation, and water conservation.

(c) The executive director shall approve:

(1) a program or course that meets the minimum curriculum standards established by the board under Subsection (a); and

(2) an instructor who meets the minimum qualifications established by the board under Subsection (a).

(d) A person may receive credit for participating in a continuing professional education program or course only if the program or course is approved by the executive director.

(e) A person may complete the continuing professional education requirement of this section through a correspondence course as approved by the executive director.

(f) The board by rule may exempt certain persons from the requirements of this section if the board determines that the exemption is in the public interest.

(g) A person who is employed by, under contract with, or engaged as a volunteer by a school or institution of higher education to provide instruction in a career and technology education program described by Section 1301.3542 and provides meaningful course instruction in the program, as determined under rules adopted under Section 1301.407, may renew the person's license and any endorsement without complying with Subsection (b) if the person completes the hours of continuing professional education required by that subsection every three years.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.305(d), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 19, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.405. MANDATORY TRAINING FOR DRAIN CLEANER, DRAIN CLEANER-RESTRICTED REGISTRANT, AND RESIDENTIAL UTILITIES INSTALLER. (a) To renew the certificate of registration, a person who holds a certificate of registration under this chapter as a drain cleaner, drain cleaner-restricted registrant, or residential utilities installer must annually complete at least six hours of approved training that includes training in health and safety requirements, board-approved plumbing codes, and water conservation.

(a-1) The board by rule shall establish:

(1) minimum curriculum standards for a training program described by Subsection (a) for persons who hold a registration under this chapter; and

(2) minimum qualifications for an instructor of the training program.

(a-2) The executive director shall approve:

(1) a training program that meets the minimum curriculum standards established by the board under Subsection (a-1); and

(2) an instructor who meets the minimum qualifications established by the board under Subsection (a-1).

(b) A person may receive credit for participating in a training program only if the program is approved by the executive director.

(c) The board by rule may exempt certain persons from the requirements of this section if the board determines that the exemption is in the public interest.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 20, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.4055. PERIOD FOR COMPLETING CONTINUING EDUCATION. The board shall adopt rules to ensure that each holder of a license, registration, or endorsement has at least 12 months to complete any continuing education required for the renewal of the license, registration, or endorsement.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 21, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.406. TRANSFER OF LICENSE NUMBER. (a) On approval by the board, a person who holds an unexpired license under this chapter and whose license has been held continuously for at least 35 consecutive years may transfer the license number on the date of the person's retirement or death to another person who:

(1) is related within the second degree by consanguinity to the transferor; and

(2) holds a license issued under this chapter that is the same type of license as the license held by the transferor.

(b) The application for a transfer of a license number under this section must include the transferor's consent and a designation of whether the license number will transfer on the retirement or death of the transferor.

(c) The board shall transfer a license number to a person who submits an application and presents evidence satisfactory to the board that:

(1) the person meets the requirements under Subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2); and

(2) the transferor is retired or dead.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1074 (H.B. 2464), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 273 (H.B. 2095), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 1301.407. PROCEDURES FOR VERIFYING CERTAIN EXEMPTIONS. The board, in consultation with the State Board of Education and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, as appropriate, may adopt rules as necessary to verify whether a person qualifies for an exemption from the required renewal fee, as described by Section 1301.401(c), or an exemption from required continuing professional education, as described by Section 1301.404(g), including rules providing for obtaining and evaluating written verification from the applicable school or institution of higher education of the person's provision of meaningful course instruction in a career and technology education program described by Section 1301.3542.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 22, eff. May 26, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER I. DISCIPLINARY PROCEDURES

Sec. 1301.451. DISCIPLINARY POWERS OF BOARD. (a) The board shall revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to renew a license, endorsement, or registration or shall reprimand a holder of a license, endorsement, or registration for a violation of this chapter, an order issued by the board, or a rule of the board.

(b) A person whose license, endorsement, or registration has been revoked may not apply for a new license, endorsement, or registration before the first anniversary of the date of revocation.

(c) The board may place on probation a person whose license, endorsement, or registration is suspended. If a license, endorsement, or registration suspension is probated, the board may require the person:

(1) to report regularly to the agency on matters that are the basis of the probation;

(2) to limit practice to the areas prescribed by the board; or

(3) to continue or review professional education until the person attains a degree of skill satisfactory to the board in those areas that are the basis of the probation.

(d) The board by rule shall:

(1) adopt written guidelines to ensure that probation is administered consistently; and

(2) develop a system to track compliance with the probation requirements.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 22(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1301.452. GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION. (a) A person is subject to disciplinary action under Section 1301.451 if the person violates this chapter, an order issued by the board, or a board rule. A violation of this chapter includes:

(1) attempting to obtain or obtaining a license, endorsement, or registration through fraud;

(2) wilfully, negligently, or arbitrarily violating a municipal rule or ordinance that regulates sanitation, drainage, or plumbing;

(3) making a misrepresentation of services provided or to be provided;

(4) making a false promise with the intent to induce a person to contract for a service;

(5) employing a person who does not hold a license or endorsement or who is not registered to engage in an activity for which a license, endorsement, or registration is required under this chapter;

(6) performing plumbing without holding the proper license, endorsement, or registration required by this chapter; or

(7) performing plumbing in violation of a plumbing code adopted under Section 1301.255.

(b) Retesting procedures may be used to determine whether grounds exist for suspension or revocation of a license, endorsement, or registration due to incompetence or a wilful violation by a person licensed under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.313(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 23, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.4521. CONSEQUENCES OF CRIMINAL CONVICTION. (a) The board shall adopt rules in compliance with the guidelines authorized by Chapter 53 relating to criminal convictions.

(b) The board shall adopt a method to review the agency's compliance with Chapter 53 and the rules adopted under this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.453. HEARING. A person is entitled to a hearing before the board if the board proposes to:

(1) deny the person's application for a license, endorsement, or registration; or

(2) suspend or revoke the person's license, endorsement, or registration.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.313(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.454. ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE. A proceeding under this subchapter is a contested case for purposes of Chapter 2001, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER J. OTHER PENALTIES AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS

Sec. 1301.501. BACKFLOW PREVENTION. (a) A person may not sell, donate, or transfer a water closet plumbing fixture or other equipment that uses water if the fixture or equipment:

(1) does not comply with a state-approved plumbing code; and

(2) may permit the backflow of a nonpotable substance into a potable water supply.

(b) The board shall adopt rules under this section that include a list describing the types of plumbing to which this section applies.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.502. CITATION. (a) A water district plumbing inspector or, within the jurisdiction of the municipality, municipal plumbing inspector may issue a citation to a person who engages in conduct described by Section 1301.508.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(9), eff. May 26, 2021.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 24, eff. May 26, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 32(9), eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.503. ENFORCEMENT BY PLUMBING INSPECTOR. Each plumbing inspector shall enforce this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.314(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.504. INJUNCTION. (a) In addition to any other action authorized by law, the board may bring an action in the board's name to enjoin a person from violating this chapter or a board rule.

(b) To sustain an action under this section, the board is not required to allege or prove that:

(1) an adequate remedy at law does not exist; or

(2) substantial or irreparable damage would result from the continued violation.

(c) Any party to an action under this section may appeal.

(d) Venue for an action brought under this section is in a district court in Travis County.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1301.5045. CEASE AND DESIST ORDER. (a) The executive director may issue a cease and desist order as necessary to enforce this chapter if the executive director determines that the action is necessary to prevent a violation of this chapter and to protect public health and safety.

(b) A violation of an order under this section constitutes grounds for imposing an administrative penalty under Subchapter N.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1301.506. APPEAL BOND NOT REQUIRED. The board is not required to post an appeal bond in an action arising under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.507. CIVIL PENALTY. A person who violates this chapter or a rule, permit, or order of the board is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $50 or more than $1,000 for each act of violation and for each day of violation after notice is provided to the person.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.5071. INFORMAL SETTLEMENT CONFERENCE; RESTITUTION. (a) The board by rule shall establish procedures under which an informal settlement conference is conducted to resolve a complaint against a person licensed under this chapter.

(a-1) The procedures established under Subsection (a) must:

(1) identify the types of complaints for which an informal settlement conference may be used; and

(2) require appropriate documentation of each informal settlement conference that is conducted, including the outcome of the conference.

(b) Subject to Subsection (c), the board may order a person licensed under this chapter to pay restitution to a person as provided in an agreement resulting from an informal settlement conference instead of or in addition to assessing an administrative penalty under Subchapter N.

(c) The amount of restitution ordered as provided by an agreement resulting from an informal settlement conference may not exceed the amount the person paid to the license holder for a service regulated by this chapter. The board may not require payment of other damages or estimate harm in a restitution order.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 25, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.508. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) violates this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter;

(2) does not hold a license or endorsement or is not registered under this chapter and engages in an activity for which a license, endorsement, or registration is required; or

(3) employs a person who does not hold a license or endorsement or who is not registered to engage in an activity for which a license, endorsement, or registration is required under this chapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.313(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER K. REGULATION BY CERTAIN POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS

Sec. 1301.551. MUNICIPAL PLUMBING ORDINANCES AND PERMITS. (a) A municipality with more than 5,000 inhabitants shall regulate by ordinance or bylaw the material, construction, alteration, and inspection of any pipe, faucet, tank, valve, water heater, or other fixture by or through which a supply of water, gas, or sewage is used or carried.

(b) Any other municipality may regulate by ordinance or bylaw the matters described by Subsection (a).

(c) A municipality that adopts an ordinance or bylaw under this section shall provide by ordinance or bylaw that a person must obtain a permit before the person performs plumbing, other than the repairing of leaks, the replacement of lavatory or kitchen faucets, the replacement of ballcocks or water control valves, the replacement of garbage disposals, or the replacement of water closets. The municipality may prescribe the terms on which the permit is issued.

(d) A plumbing inspection in a municipality that adopts an ordinance or bylaw under this section must be performed by a plumbing inspector.

(e) A municipality or other political subdivision in this state that requires a plumbing contractor to obtain a permit before the person performs plumbing shall by telephone, fax, or e-mail:

(1) accept permit applications;

(2) collect required fees; and

(3) issue the required permits.

(f) If drawings of proposed plumbing work are required by the municipality or other political subdivision, the municipality or political subdivision shall specify how permit drawings are to be submitted.

(g) A responsible master plumber, plumbing contractor, or other person who is required to obtain a permit under this section is not required to pay a plumbing registration fee or administrative fee in a municipality or any other political subdivision.

(h) A plumbing contractor must register, electronically or in person, with a municipality or other political subdivision that requires registration before performing plumbing regulated by the municipality or other political subdivision.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, after January 1, 2009, a municipality may not enact an ordinance, bylaw, order, building code, or rule requiring the installation of a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system or any other fire sprinkler protection system in a new or existing one- or two-family dwelling. A municipality may adopt an ordinance, bylaw, order, or rule allowing a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler specialist or other contractor to offer, for a fee, the installation of a fire sprinkler protection system in a new one- or two-family dwelling.

(j) A multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler specialist may install a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system in a new or existing one- or two-family dwelling in a municipality described by Subsection (a) or (b).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.315(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.001(46), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 981 (H.B. 2062), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 1301.552. CERTIFICATE OF INSURANCE FOR PLUMBING PERMIT IN POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. A political subdivision that requires a responsible master plumber or an agent of a responsible master plumber to obtain a permit before performing plumbing in the political subdivision shall verify through the board's Internet website, or by contacting the board by telephone, that the responsible master plumber has on file with the board a certificate of insurance. The certificate of insurance must:

(1) be written by an insurer authorized to engage in the business of insurance in this state or an eligible surplus lines insurer, as defined by Section 981.002, Insurance Code;

(2) provide for commercial general liability insurance for the responsible master plumber for a claim for property damage or bodily injury, regardless of whether the claim arises from negligence or on a contract; and

(3) provide coverage of not less than $300,000 for all claims arising in a one-year period.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (H.B. 2376), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1301.553. PLUMBING INSPECTIONS IN MUNICIPALITY THAT OVERLAPS ANOTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. If the boundaries of a municipality and another political subdivision overlap, only the affected municipality may perform a plumbing inspection and collect a permit fee.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.315(c), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1380 (S.B. 1354), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER M. INTERAGENCY COOPERATION AND REGULATION

Sec. 1301.651. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "local workforce development board" means a board created under Subchapter F, Chapter 2308, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.652. PUBLIC EDUCATION EFFORT. (a) The board and the Texas Workforce Commission shall, through the local workforce development boards, coordinate efforts to educate the public about the plumbing profession and the resources available to employers for the recruitment and training of plumbers, including providing:

(1) each local workforce development board with:

(A) information about the licensing requirements for the plumbing profession; and

(B) available statistical data regarding plumbing; and

(2) a link to each agency's Internet site and to the Internet sites of other local workforce development boards.

(b) The board may, during public and industry awareness seminars, raise awareness of the career ladder in the plumbing industry and the opportunities that plumbing apprenticeships offer.

(c) This section applies to the extent that the plumbing profession is designated as an occupation in demand by a local workforce development board.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER N. ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY

Sec. 1301.701. IMPOSITION OF PENALTY. The board may impose an administrative penalty on a person who violates this chapter or a rule or order adopted under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.702. AMOUNT OF PENALTY. (a) The amount of an administrative penalty may not exceed $5,000 for each violation. Each day a violation continues or occurs is a separate violation for purposes of imposing a penalty.

(b) The amount of the penalty shall be based on:

(1) the seriousness of the violation, including:

(A) the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of any prohibited act; and

(B) the hazard or potential hazard created to the health, safety, or economic welfare of the public;

(2) the economic harm to property or the environment caused by the violation;

(3) the history of previous violations;

(4) the amount necessary to deter a future violation;

(5) efforts made to correct the violation; and

(6) any other matter that justice may require.

(c) The board by rule or through procedures adopted by the board and published in the Texas Register shall develop a standardized penalty schedule based on the criteria listed in Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.703. NOTICE OF VIOLATION AND PENALTY.

(a) If the board determines that a violation occurred, the board shall give written notice of the violation to the person alleged to have committed the violation.

(c) The notice must:

(1) include a brief summary of the alleged violation;

(2) state the amount of the recommended penalty; and

(3) inform the person of the person's right to a hearing on the occurrence of the violation, the amount of the penalty, or both.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 26, eff. May 26, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 27, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.704. PENALTY TO BE PAID OR HEARING REQUESTED. (a) Not later than the 20th day after the date the person receives the notice, the person in writing may:

(1) accept the determination and recommended penalty of the board; or

(2) make a request for a hearing on the occurrence of the violation, the amount of the penalty, or both.

(b) If the person accepts the determination and recommended penalty of the board, the board by order shall approve the determination and impose the recommended penalty.

(c) Failure to request a hearing or accept the determination and recommended penalty within the time provided by this section waives the right to a hearing under this chapter.

(d) If the board determines without a hearing that the person committed a violation and a penalty is to be imposed, the board shall:

(1) provide written notice to the person of the board's findings; and

(2) enter an order requiring the person to pay the recommended penalty.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2065), Sec. 9.001, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 28, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.705. HEARING. (a) If the person requests a hearing, the board shall set a hearing and give written notice of the hearing to the person. An administrative law judge of the State Office of Administrative Hearings shall hold the hearing.

(b) The administrative law judge shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and promptly issue to the board a proposal for a decision about the occurrence of the violation and the amount of a proposed penalty.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2065), Sec. 9.002, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 29, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.706. DECISION BY BOARD. (a) Based on the findings of fact, conclusions of law, and proposal for a decision, the board by order may:

(1) find that a violation occurred and impose a penalty; or

(2) find that a violation did not occur.

(b) The notice of the board's order given to the person must include a statement of the right of the person to judicial review of the order.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.707. OPTIONS FOLLOWING DECISION: PAY OR APPEAL. (a) Not later than the 30th day after the date the board's order becomes final, the person shall:

(1) pay the penalty; or

(2) file a petition for judicial review contesting the occurrence of the violation, the amount of the penalty, or both.

(b) Failure by the person to pay the penalty is grounds for the board to refuse to renew the person's license or registration and to refuse to issue a new license or registration to the person.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 804 (S.B. 1410), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1301.708. STAY OF ENFORCEMENT OF PENALTY. (a) Within the 30-day period prescribed by Section 1301.707, a person who files a petition for judicial review may:

(1) stay enforcement of the penalty by:

(A) paying the penalty to the court for placement in an escrow account; or

(B) giving the court a supersedeas bond approved by the court that:

(i) is for the amount of the penalty; and

(ii) is effective until all judicial review of the board's order is final; or

(2) request the court to stay enforcement of the penalty by:

(A) filing with the court a sworn affidavit of the person stating that the person is financially unable to pay the penalty and is financially unable to give the supersedeas bond; and

(B) sending a copy of the affidavit to the board by certified mail.

(b) If the board receives a copy of an affidavit under Subsection (a)(2), the executive director may file with the court, not later than the fifth day after the date the copy is received, a contest to the affidavit.

(c) The court shall hold a hearing on the facts alleged in the affidavit as soon as practicable and shall stay the enforcement of the penalty on finding that the alleged facts are true. The person who files an affidavit has the burden of proving that the person is financially unable to pay the penalty and to give a supersedeas bond.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 137 (H.B. 636), Sec. 30, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 1301.709. DECISION BY COURT. (a) If the court sustains the finding that a violation occurred, the court may uphold or reduce the amount of the penalty and order the person to pay the full or reduced amount of the penalty.

(b) If the court does not sustain the finding that a violation occurred, the court shall order that a penalty is not owed.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.710. REMITTANCE OF PENALTY AND INTEREST. (a) If the person paid the penalty and if the amount of the penalty is reduced or the penalty is not upheld by the court, the court shall order, when the court's judgment becomes final, that the appropriate amount plus accrued interest be remitted to the person.

(b) The interest accrues at the rate charged on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.

(c) The interest shall be paid for the period beginning on the date the penalty is paid and ending on the date the penalty is remitted.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.711. RELEASE OF BOND. (a) If the person gave a supersedeas bond and the penalty is not upheld by the court, the court shall order, when the court's judgment becomes final, the release of the bond.

(b) If the person gave a supersedeas bond and the amount of the penalty is reduced, the court shall order the release of the bond after the person pays the reduced amount.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.712. COLLECTION OF PENALTY. (a) If the person does not pay the penalty and the enforcement of the penalty is not stayed, the penalty may be collected.

(b) The attorney general may sue to collect the penalty.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1301.713. ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE. A proceeding to impose the penalty is considered to be a contested case under Chapter 2001, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.